Maryland, session 2025, HB1496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
12–205.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Electric vehicle” means a vehicle that uses electricity for propulsion.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1496*

HOUSE BILL 1496
(3) “Electric vehicle supply equipment” means a device or facility for
delivering electricity to an electric vehicle.
(4) “EV–ready parking space” means a parking space that has electrical
panel capacity and full circuit installation of a minimum 40–ampere, 208/240–volt circuit,
raceway wiring, a NEMA 14–50R receptacle, and circuit overcurrent protection devices.
(5) “EVSE–installed parking space” means a parking space with electric
vehicle supply equipment that is fully installed from the electrical panel to the parking
space.
(6) [(i)] “Housing units” means:
[1.] (I) single–family detached houses;
[2.] (II) duplexes; [and]
[3.] (III) town houses that are subject to the provisions of the
International Residential Code; AND
(IV) MULTIFAMILY RESIDENTIAL BUILDINGS.
[(ii) “Housing units” does not include multifamily residential
buildings that are subject to the provisions of the International Building Code.]
(7) “Level 2 charging” means that the charging capability of the electric
vehicle supply equipment:
(i) includes the ability to charge a battery or any other energy
storage device in an electric vehicle through means of an alternating current electrical
service with a minimum of 208 volts; and
(ii) meets applicable industry safety standards.
(8) “MULTIFAMILY RESIDENTIAL BUILDING” MEANS A BUILDING
THAT:
(I) CONTAINS TWO OR MORE LEASED OR OWNED RESIDENTIAL
UNITS; AND
(II) IS SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THE INTERNATIONAL
BUILDING CODE.
(9) “SIGNIFICANT RENOVATION” MEANS:

HOUSE BILL 1496 3
(I) A RENOVATION TO A HOUSING UNIT THAT INCLUDES
ELECTRICAL PANEL UPGRADES THAT INCREASE THE CAPACITY OF THE PANEL; OR
(II) PARKING UPGRADES THAT INVOLVE REPAVING OR
TRENCHING IN OR AROUND PARKING SPACES.
[(8)] (10) “Vehicle” has the meaning stated in § 11–176 of the
Transportation Article.
(b) (1) This subsection applies to the construction OR SIGNIFICANT
RENOVATION of housing units that include a separate garage, carport, or driveway for
each residential unit.
(2) The construction of a new housing unit OR SIGNIFICANT
RENOVATION TO AN EXISTING HOUSING UNIT shall include in or on the garage, carport,
or driveway:
(i) one EVSE–installed parking space capable of providing at least
Level 2 charging; or
(ii) one EV–ready parking space.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE CONSTRUCTION OR
SIGNIFICANT RENOVATION OF HOUSING UNITS THAT INCLUDE SEPARATE GARAGES,
CARPORTS, OR DRIVEWAYS FOR EACH RESIDENTIAL UNIT.
(2) IF THE CONSTRUCTION OR SIGNIFICANT RENOVATION OF
HOUSING UNITS INCLUDES OR WILL INCLUDE ON–SITE, OFF–STREET, COMMON USE
PARKING, THE CONSTRUCTION OR SIGNIFICANT RENOVATION OF THE HOUSING
UNITS SHALL INCLUDE, FOR EVERY 25 RESIDENTIAL UNITS, AT LEAST ONE COMMON
USE EVSE–INSTALLED PARKING SPACE.
(3) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, CONSTRUCTION OF A NEW HOUSING UNIT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) AT LEAST ONE EVSE–INSTALLED PARKING SPACE CAPABLE
OF PROVIDING AT LEAST LEVEL 2 CHARGING LOCATED IN A COMMON USE PARKING
AREA THAT IS AVAILABLE FOR USE BY ALL RESIDENTS; AND
(II) THE FOLLOWING NUMBER OF EV–READY PARKING SPACES
DEDICATED TO SPECIFIC RESIDENTIAL UNITS OR FOR COMMON USE:

HOUSE BILL 1496
1. FOR A DEVELOPMENT APPLICATION OR BUILDING
PERMIT APPLICATION MADE ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2025, AT LEAST 10% OF THE
PARKING SPACES;
2. FOR A DEVELOPMENT APPLICATION OR BUILDING
PERMIT APPLICATION MADE ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2031, AT LEAST 20% OF THE
PARKING SPACES; AND
3. FOR A DEVELOPMENT APPLICATION OR BUILDING
PERMIT APPLICATION MADE ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2036, AT LEAST 30% OF THE
PARKING SPACES.
(4) EACH COMMON USE EVSE–INSTALLED PARKING SPACE
INSTALLED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE MARKED WITH A
SIGN THAT:
(I) INDICATES THAT THE CHARGING SPACE IS ONLY FOR
ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGING;
(II) INCLUDES ANY DAY OR TIME RESTRICTIONS;
(III) STATES THE MAXIMUM FINE THAT MAY BE INCURRED FOR A
VIOLATION; AND
(IV) IS CONSISTENT WITH THE DESIGN AND PLACEMENT
SPECIFICATIONS ESTABLISHED IN THE MANUAL ON UNIFORM TRAFFIC CONTROL
DEVICES FOR STREETS AND HIGHWAYS ADOPTED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 25–104 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
[(c)] (D) Notwithstanding any other law, a county or municipal corporation may
require the construction of housing units to include a greater number of EVSE–installed
parking spaces or EV–ready parking spaces than are required under [subsection]
SUBSECTIONS (b) AND (C) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.